Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 5. Comprehensive Small Business Act of 1983.

§ 57-10-151.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as “The Comprehensive Small Business Act of 1983.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1983).

§ 57-10-153.
Legislative intent.

In order to stimulate the expansion of existing small businesses and to encourage the formation of new economically sound small business enterprises in this state, it is the intent of the legislature to create a consortium of state agencies and educational institutions which provide services to the state’s non-agricultural small businesses for the purpose of coordinating delivery and avoiding duplication of such services to the small business community.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1983).

§ 57-10-155.
Definitions.

Whenever the following terms are used herein they shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Small business” means a non-agricultural business as defined by the small business administration’s most current declaration of small business size standards.

“Non-agricultural business” means businesses classified by the Standard Industrial Classification Code (SIC code) as Major Groups 10 through 79. Agricultural production and services, forestry and fisheries (Major Groups 01 through 09) are excluded from the provisions of this article.

“Consortium” means the state agencies or educational institutions which provide services to small businesses and are so designated by this article.

“Consortium board” means the governing body of the consortium formed to set policy and ensure that there is a coordinated program of assistance to the state’s small businesses.

“Coordinator” means a staff member of the consortium designated by the consortium board to coordinate delivery of services to small businesses.

“Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc.” means the corporation organized pursuant to Section 57-10-167 as a not-for-profit and non-share public corporation organized and chartered for the purpose of furthering the economic development of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1983).

§ 57-10-157.
Composition of Small Business Consortium.

Member agencies and institutions which are included in the Small Business Consortium are as follows:

Department of Economic Development;

Governor’s Office of Federal-State Programs;

All state-supported universities; and

All public junior colleges.

Other agencies or institutions serving small business may be added or deleted from the consortium by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the consortium board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-10-159.
Small Business Consortium Board created; composition; compensation and expenses of members; meetings.

There is hereby created the Small Business Consortium Board which shall be the policymaking body for the state’s program of services to nonagricultural small businesses. The consortium board will be composed of the following seven (7) members: The Executive Director of the Department of Economic and Community Development; the Director of the University Research Center; the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration; the Director of the Enterprise Development Division of the Department of Economic and Community Development; the president of a public junior college appointed by the Mississippi Junior College Association; the President of the Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc.; and the District Director of the Small Business Administration.

Members of the consortium board shall receive no compensation for their services as members of the board. All consortium board members who are employees of the state or any entity thereof may receive reimbursement for actual and necessary traveling and subsistence expenses incurred, such reimbursement to be in the manner provided for in Section 25-3-41.

A majority of the consortium board shall constitute a quorum, but less than a quorum may adjourn the meeting from time to time. The consortium board shall hold its meetings on at least a semiannual basis by call of the coordinator or a majority of the consortium board, and such meetings may be held at any place within the State of Mississippi acceptable to a majority of the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 48; Laws, 1990, ch. 502, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 57-10-161.
General duties and responsibilities of consortium board; review of certain assistance proposals.

The duties and responsibilities of the consortium board shall be to set policy regarding delivery, and to implement delivery, of services to the state’s non-agricultural small businesses, which services are provided by the consortium members or other state-supported agencies or institutions.

In order to ensure that existing delivery systems for services to small businesses are utilized whenever possible and to avoid duplication of services, any proposals for programs, grants or funding intended to provide services to small business in the general population or targeted areas of the state which are under consideration by state agencies or institutions, not members of the consortium, shall be reviewed by the consortium board. The board shall determine whether to include a program within one of the member agencies or delivery systems; include the agency or institution within the consortium; or disapprove the proposal. Excluded from this review process shall be any site-specific studies or fee-paid services provided by faculty members within the state university system and fee-paid services to small businesses provided by other state agencies or departments within the state university system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1983).

§ 57-10-163.
Coordinator of small business consortium.

It shall be the responsibility of the coordinator of the small business consortium to preside at meetings of the consortium board and to bring to the attention of the board the changing and evolving problems and needs of Mississippi small businesses; the need for addition, modification, or deletion of particular services; the existence of duplication of effort; the need for coordination; and any other situations relative to the effective delivery of state-supported services to small businesses of the state.

The coordinator shall be required to maintain current descriptions of and familiarity with the technical service programs provided by the consortium members to small businesses. These programs include but are not limited to: providing direct counseling assistance to business people in the areas of management, marketing, finance, and production as it relates to establishing a new or operating an existing small business in the state; providing business data and information necessary to make informed management decisions; and conducting training seminars and workshops on topics vital to the small business community of the state. The coordinator shall advise the consortium board of the need for addition, modification or deletion of particular services; the existence of duplication of effort; and the need for coordination. It shall be the responsibility of the consortium board to implement such changes in technical assistance programs as it deems necessary to comply with the intent of this article.

The coordinator shall be selected by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote of the consortium board and shall serve at the will and pleasure of the consortium board. The coordinator shall be a full-time staff member of one of the consortium agencies or institutions or of the small business administration, and shall be located in Jackson, Mississippi. The coordinator may from time to time call special meetings of the consortium board as needed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1983).

§ 57-10-165.
Small Business Clearinghouse.

There is hereby created a unit within the consortium to be known as the Small Business Clearinghouse which shall provide a single contact point for the state’s small businesses seeking assistance, make them aware of programs available to them, and direct them to the appropriate delivering organization.

The Small Business Clearinghouse shall be part of the Mississippi Department of Economic Development, and the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Economic Development shall be authorized to employ a full-time staff member and to expend such funds as necessary to effectively implement the duties assigned this unit.

In order to ensure that the general small business public is informed of this single contact point for gaining access to state-supported services, the Small Business Clearinghouse shall establish and maintain an outreach program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 8; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 49, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-10-167.
Establishment of Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc.; appointment, terms of office and compensation of members; executive director; officers and board of directors; redesignation as Mississippi Business Finance Corporation.

There is hereby established the Certified Development Company of Mississippi, a public corporation, which shall be an incorporated certified development company pursuant to Section 503 of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958, as amended.

The Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc., hereinafter referred to as the “committee” unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall be composed of twenty-five (25) members as follows:

The State Treasurer; the Executive Director of the University Research Center or his designee; the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority; the Executive Director of the Small Business Development Center; six (6) persons associated with small business to be appointed by the Governor, one (1) for a term of one (1) year, one (1) for a term of two (2) years, one (1) for a term of three (3) years, one (1) for a term of four (4) years, one (1) for a term of five (5) years and one (1) for a term of six (6) years; three (3) persons associated with small business to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor, one (1) for a term of one (1) year, one (1) for a term of two (2) years and one (1) for a term of three (3) years; five (5) persons involved in banking or small business to be appointed by the Governor, one (1) for a term of one (1) year, one (1) for a term of two (2) years, one (1) for a term of three (3) years, one (1) for a term of four (4) years and one (1) for a term of five (5) years; and two (2) persons involved in banking or small business to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor, one (1) for a term of one (1) year and one (1) for a term of two (2) years. The members described above and serving on the committee on June 30, 1984, shall continue to serve on the committee until the expiration of their terms.

For terms to begin on July 1, 1984, the Governor shall appoint one (1) person associated with small business for a term of six (6) years; the Secretary of State shall appoint one (1) person associated with small business for a term of one (1) year; the Attorney General shall appoint one (1) person involved in banking or small business for a term of six (6) years; and the State Treasurer shall appoint two (2) persons, one (1) for a term of one (1) year and one (1) for a term of two (2) years, and after the expiration of the term of the person appointed hereinabove by the Attorney General, that vacancy shall be filled thereafter by a person involved in banking or small business appointed by the State Treasurer for a term of six (6) years.

All appointments after the initial appointment shall be for terms of six (6) years each. All such appointments will be subject to the approval of the Senate. An appointment to fill a vacancy existing for any reason other than the expiration of a term shall be for the balance of the unexpired term. Members serving by reason of their ex officio designation shall continue to serve as long as they occupy the position which entitles them to membership.

Members who are officers or employees of the state shall receive no compensation for their services, and other committee members shall receive a per diem as provided in Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972. All members shall receive reimbursement for actual traveling and subsistence expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under this article, such reimbursement to be as provided in Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc., shall have an executive director who shall be appointed by the board of directors.

The Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc., shall elect from among its membership a nine-member board of directors, a majority of whom shall be a quorum, a president and vice president and may appoint a secretary and a treasurer.

From and after July 1, 1989, the Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc., shall be known as the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation, and wherever the term “Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc.,” appears in the laws of this state it shall mean the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 9; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 326; Laws, 1985, ch. 434; Laws, 1986, ch. 375; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 50; Laws, 1989, ch. 524, § 24; Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 6, 2001.).

§ 57-10-169.
Abolition of Mississippi Economic Development Corporation and small businessman’s loan committee; transfer of powers, duties and authority.

From and after July 1, 1983, the Mississippi Economic Development Corporation and the small businessman’s loan committee shall be abolished and the powers, duties and authority granted the Mississippi Economic Development Corporation and the small businessman’s loan committee pursuant to Articles 1 and 3, Chapter 10, Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall at that time be transferred to the Certified Development Company of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 434, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1983).